Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Vietnam Veterans

40.400.
Definitions for KRS 40.410 to 40.560.

As used in KRS

40.410

to

40.560

, the following terms have the following respective meanings, unless another meaning is clearly required by the context:

“Department of Military Affairs” means the office of the adjutant general, Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Administrator” means the individual designated by the adjutant general to carry out the responsibilities of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

;

“Armed Forces” means the United States Army, Navy, Marine Corps, Air Force, and Coast Guard, including the reserve components thereof on active duty, other than for training, and shall not include the merchant marine;

“Qualified veteran” means any person whose period of active duty service meets the criteria set forth in subsection (5) or (6) of this section;

“Qualifying Vietnam service” means service by any person who:

Served as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States in Vietnam or its contiguous waters or airspace, as defined in United States Department of Defense Directive 1348.15, October 1, 1965, for a period of at least thirty (30) days, unless such period was lessened as a result of death or medical evacuation, during the period July 1, 1958, through May 15, 1975; or served as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States in the Dominican Republic, Congo, Thailand, Laos, or Cambodia, or participated in aerial missions in the airspace over same, for a period of at least thirty (30) days, unless such period was lessened as a result of death or medical evacuation, during the period July 3, 1965, through May 15, 1975; or served as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States and was awarded, or was eligible for award of, the Vietnam Service Medal established by United States Department of Defense Directive 1348.15, October 1, 1965;

Was released, separated, or discharged from the Armed Forces under other than dishonorable conditions or who is presently serving on active duty;

Was a resident of the Commonwealth at the time of entry into active service in the Armed Forces and for at least six (6) months prior thereto; and

Has not received a similar bonus for such service from any other state;

“Qualifying Vietnam era service” means service by any person who:

Served in the Armed Forces of the United States on active duty, including service in a reserve component thereof other than for training, for at least ninety (90) consecutive days, exclusive of time lost as AWOL or in penal confinement, during the period August 5, 1964, to May 15, 1975, but whose service was in a location not included in subsection (5)(a) of this section;

Was released, separated, or discharged from the Armed Forces under other than dishonorable conditions or is still serving on active duty;

Was a resident of the Commonwealth at the time of his entry into active service in the Armed Forces and for at least six (6) months prior thereto; and

Has not received a similar bonus for such service from any other state;

“Resident of the Commonwealth at the time of entry into the active service” means any person who gave the Commonwealth of Kentucky, or any specific place in this Commonwealth, as his place of residence at the time of entry. Conclusive and exclusive evidence of the giving of place of residence shall be the official records on file in the Department of Defense of the United States, or any official record thereof in the files of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs; but if it be shown to the satisfaction of the administrator that for any reason no such record was made, or that it has been lost, misplaced, destroyed, or was in error, or that an authenticated copy thereof cannot be obtained within a reasonable time, other evidence of bona fide residence may be accepted if deemed sufficient by the administrator;

“Resident,” in any context other than as in subsections (5) and (6) of this section, means a legal resident as determined by generally established principles of law, as may be defined, and subject to proof, according to the regulations the administrator promulgates;

“Beneficiary” means the following persons who were alive at the time of application, in this order: widow, if none to the child or children equally, if none to the mother and father equally, but if the father is dead, the mother, if living, shall take the whole amount; but if the mother is dead, the father, if living, shall take the whole amount;

“Widow” means a woman who was the wife of a qualified veteran at the time of his death;

The term “widow” also includes “widower” in the case of a man who was the husband of a female qualified veteran at the time of her death;

“Child” means a person:

Who is under the age of eighteen (18) at the time application is made or who was under the age of eighteen (18) at the time of the veteran’s death;

Who, before attaining the age of eighteen (18), became permanently incapable of self-support; or

Who, after attaining the age of eighteen (18) and until completion of education or training, but not after attaining the age of twenty-three (23), is pursuing a course of instruction at a bona fide educational institution; and who, in relationship to the veteran, is a legitimate child; a legally adopted child; a stepchild who is a member of a qualified veteran’s household or was a member at the time of the veteran’s death; or an illegitimate child, but, as to the alleged father, only if acknowledged in writing signed by him or if he had, before his death, been judicially decreed to be the father of such child;

“Mother” means a mother, a mother through adoption, or a woman who for a period of not less than one (1) year stood in the relationship of a mother to a qualified veteran before his or her entry into active service in the Armed Forces, or if two (2) persons stood in such relationship for one (1) year or more, the person who last stood in such relationship before the veteran’s last entry into active service in the Armed Forces;

“Father” means a father, a father through adoption, or a man who for a period of not less than one (1) year stood in the relationship of a father to a qualified veteran before his or her entry into active service in the Armed Forces, or if two (2) persons stood in such relationship for one (1) year or more, the person who last stood in such relationship before the veteran’s last entry into active service in the Armed Forces;

“In the continental United States” means any place in the District of Columbia and the states of the United States which are on the North American continent, exclusive of Alaska;

“Outside the continental United States” means any place elsewhere than as defined in subsection (14) of this section;

“Bonus” and “Vietnam veterans’ bonus” mean the compensation authorized by KRS

40.410

to

40.560

;

“Bonus claim” means a claim or potential claim for a Vietnam veterans’ bonus; and

“Claimant” means one who seeks to obtain payment of a bonus claim.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 2; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 1, effective March 1, 1991; 2017 ch. 42, § 4, effective June 29, 2017.

40.410.
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly in enacting KRS

40.400

to

40.560

that such funds sufficient for payment of the Vietnam veterans’ bonus authorized by KRS

40.420

shall be appropriated by the 1990 Regular Session of the General Assembly, or at such later times as sufficient funds for the payment of the bonus shall become available, exclusively from moneys transferred or collected from the Kentucky lottery revenues pursuant to KRS

154A.130

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 21.

40.420.
Determination and declaration that bonus be paid.

It is hereby found, determined and declared that the citizens of the Commonwealth who served in the Armed Forces during the Vietnam conflict performed a public service for the United States of America and the Commonwealth and that the payment of the Vietnam veterans’ bonus, as provided in KRS

40.410

to

40.560

, promotes the public good by rewarding the public service rendered by such individuals and by encouraging future public service by citizens of the Commonwealth.

It is hereby found, determined and declared that a bonus shall be paid by the Commonwealth of Kentucky in the amounts and to the persons determined in accordance with the provisions of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 1.

40.430.
Service for which no allowance shall be made.

No bonus shall be paid to any member of the Armed Forces of the United States who did only civilian work at civilian pay or who has received from another state a bonus similar to the bonus provided by KRS

40.410

to

40.560

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 3; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 2, effective March 1, 1991.

40.440.
Computation of bonus.

Every person determined by the administrator to be a qualified veteran shall be paid the sum of fifteen dollars ($15) for each month and major fraction of a month of qualifying Vietnam era service, not to exceed in all the sum of three hundred dollars ($300), and the sum of twenty-five dollars ($25) for each month and major fraction of a month of such service which is qualifying Vietnam service, subject to an aggregate limit for all service in the sum of five hundred dollars ($500). Any qualified veteran who was medically evacuated from a location, service in which location constituted qualifying Vietnam service, shall receive the sum of five hundred dollars ($500), this sum to be in lieu of any other bonus for which said veteran may qualify under the provisions of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

.

If a person determined to have been a qualified veteran shall be deceased at the time payment of the bonus would otherwise be made to him, the amount of his bonus shall be paid to the first surviving beneficiary, if any, according to the order of priority defined in KRS 40.400(9) and if there be no surviving beneficiary, the bonus of such veteran shall lapse, and no payment thereof shall be made.

A beneficiary, as defined in KRS 40.400(9), (10), (11), (12), and (13), of a person killed in the line of duty while serving in the Armed Forces of the United States during the period of eligibility, or who died of service-connected injury sustained while so serving, and who would otherwise have qualified for the bonus provided in subsection (1) of this section, shall be paid three hundred dollars ($300) if no part of the total service during the period was served outside the continental United States or five hundred dollars ($500) if any part of the total service during the period was served outside the continental United States. The provisions of subsection (1) of this section and the minimum period of service for entitlement to a bonus as established by KRS 40.400(5) or (6) shall not apply to these beneficiaries. However, this exception does not waive the respective maximums of three hundred dollars ($300) or five hundred dollars ($500) for each veteran, person killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed Forces, or person who died as a result of service-connected injury sustained while on active duty in the Armed Forces. Payment shall be made to a beneficiary in the order of priority defined in KRS 40.400(9).

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section, the amount paid to a qualifying veteran or a beneficiary of a qualifying veteran shall be the amount calculated under the provisions of subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section, less the amount received by the veteran under the provisions of KRS

40.005

or KRS

40.010

to

40.990

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 4; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 3, effective March 1, 1991.

40.450.
Powers and duties of Department of Military Affairs — Administration of veterans’ program trust fund by Department of Veterans’ Affairs.

The Department of Military Affairs, Commonwealth of Kentucky, shall administer the provisions of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

and shall:

Prepare and make available forms on which applications for the bonus shall be made;

Employ such additional personnel as may be required for orderly and expeditious administration;

Promulgate all administrative regulations required for the effective administration of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

, except as it relates to the veterans’ program trust fund established in KRS 40.460(2), which shall be administered by the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs. The Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall have authority to promulgate administrative regulations for the administration of the veterans’ program trust fund;

Report annually to the Governor and the Legislative Research Commission within sixty (60) days after the end of each fiscal year during its administration of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

; and

Report to the Governor and to the Legislative Research Commission not later than the thirtieth day prior to the beginning of the 1990 Regular Session of the General Assembly, and each thirty (30) days thereafter until adjournment of the 1990 Regular Session of the General Assembly, concerning the following:

The number of claims which have been submitted;

The number of claims which have been approved for payment;

The number of claims which are subject to further review; and

An accounting for the funds which have been spent in the administration of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 5; 2014, ch. 30, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

40.460.
Application for bonus.

All applications for the bonus shall be submitted to the adjutant general, Commonwealth of Kentucky, in writing, upon forms made available for that purpose, and shall be accompanied by the documentary evidence prescribed by appropriate administrative regulations. Every application shall be certified under the penalties of perjury, and shall contain representations of the claimant or, if he shall have been adjudged incompetent, or be an infant, of his committee or guardian, that:

The facts therein stated are true to the best of his knowledge and belief;

All documents submitted in support of the application are believed by the claimant to be genuine originals or copies, as the case may be, and that the claimant has no knowledge that the document has been superseded or cancelled;

The claimant has not received from another state a bonus or compensation of a like nature as provided by KRS

40.410

to

40.560

;

The claimant has not received the Kentucky veterans’ bonus provided under KRS

40.005

to

40.230

and

40.990

;

The claimant has neither paid nor agreed to pay, directly or indirectly, any compensation for assistance received in preparing and tendering the application; and

The claimant has knowledge of the fine and forfeiture provisions of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

;

The application form shall contain provision for, and each claimant shall elect, one (1) of the following choices:

The claimant is eligible for and desires to receive a bonus payment; or

The claimant is eligible for a bonus payment but requests that his payment be deposited into a veterans’ program trust fund, which is hereby established, the proceeds and interest therefrom to be used for veterans’ programs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 6; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 4, effective March 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 244, § 9, effective July 15, 1996; 2011, ch. 27, § 1, effective June 8, 2011.

40.470.
Time of filing applications — Return of late applications.

No application shall be filed with or sent to the adjutant general before the first day of March, 1989.

No application may be filed with or sent to the administrator after the twenty-eighth day of February, 1990, but if an application is sent by mail, the adjutant general shall receive it if the postmark on the envelope shows date and time of mailing at or before midnight, central standard time, on or before the twenty-eighth day of February, 1990.

Applications tendered to the adjutant general otherwise than as provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not be eligible for consideration under KRS

40.410

to

40.560

and shall not be accepted. Each such application received by mail shall be returned to the sender, if a return address be given, together with notification of the reason for its return.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

40.400

,

40.430

, or any other statute to the contrary, persons who have received the Kentucky veterans’ bonus provided under KRS

40.005

to

40.230

or their beneficiaries may apply for the bonus provided for by KRS

40.400

to

40.560

by filing an application on or before the thirty-first day of October, 1991, but if an application is sent by mail, the adjutant general shall receive it if the application is postmarked no later than the thirty-first day of October, 1991. The form of application shall be that specified in KRS

40.460

, except that the statement required by KRS

40.460

(1)(d) shall not be applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 7; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 5, effective March 1, 1991.

40.480.
Discretionary hearing.

No claimant shall be entitled to an oral hearing as a matter of right, but the adjutant general may in his discretion order a hearing in any case presenting unusual circumstances, or where it appears that documentary evidence of any material fact cannot reasonably be obtained, or where the claim cannot otherwise adequately be determined. If a hearing is ordered, it shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B. The adjutant general may investigate any matter which in his judgment is not adequately proven, or which shows or raises an inference of fraud, and may require submission of supplementary proof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 8; 1996, ch. 318, § 26, effective July 15, 1996.

40.490.
Hearing procedure. [Repealed.]

40.500.
Burden of proof.

The burden of proving to the satisfaction of the adjutant general that a bonus is payable shall in all cases be upon the claimant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 10.

40.510.
Prompt determination to be made.

The adjutant general shall make prompt determination that each application is approved or disapproved for payment of a bonus, and if approved, shall determine the amount to be paid according to the provisions of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 11.

40.520.
Notice of disapproval of claim to be sent to claimant — Review procedure.

If a claim is disapproved, the adjutant general shall send a notice of such decision to the claimant by mail at the address shown in the application. The notice shall be in such form as the adjutant general may determine, contain a designation of the reason for disapproval, inform the claimant of his right to seek review, have attached such form of request for review as the adjutant general may prescribe, and shall give information as to the procedure for review.

Application for review of a disapproval shall be made only on the forms prescribed and be received in the designated office not later than the closing hour in the thirtieth day after the day upon which the notice of disapproval is mailed, or be forever barred.

Upon receiving an application for review, the administrator shall transmit the same, together with the original application and all papers in the case, to the board of review, hereinafter created.

The board of review shall promptly consider the same evidence which was available to the administrator, and promptly enter in the case file its decision either finally affirming the administrator’s decision, or finally determining the claim and the amount thereof.

The board of review shall send a notice of its decision to the claimant by registered mail, and return the case file to the administrator. The decision of the board of review shall be a final determination of the claim shown in the application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 12.

40.530.
Effect of final disapproval — Procedure.

If the administrator shall disapprove any claim, or if the decision of the board of review be affirmance of the administrator’s disapproval of the claim:

No payment of a bonus shall be made; and

The administrator, upon receiving advice of the decision, shall note the same in a permanent book or record in his office; shall forthwith return to the claimant the copies of any official records submitted in support of the application; shall finally close the claim file; and may destroy all other papers except the application.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 13.

40.540.
Setting off tax delinquency against bonus.

If a claim is approved by the administrator or finally approved upon resort to the board of review, the administrator shall promptly certify to the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet the names and addresses of persons found entitled to be paid, as shown in the application, and the amount payable to each.

A copy of each such certificate shall be sent to the commissioner of the Department of Revenue, who shall promptly ascertain from the records of his agency whether any person proposed to be paid a bonus is delinquent in the payment of any tax liability to the Commonwealth. No delinquency shall be deemed to exist as to any asserted tax liability which is the subject of a bona fide dispute. If any delinquency be found to exist, the commissioner of revenue shall, within three (3) working days after this receipt of the certificate, furnish the details thereof to the secretary of finance and administration; and if no advice of tax delinquency is received by the secretary of finance and administration before the end of the fourth working day after his receipt of certification from the administrator, he shall, for the purposes of KRS

40.410

to

40.560

, conclusively presume that no delinquency of tax liability to the Commonwealth exists, but such presumption shall apply only to the existence or absence of a set-off by the Commonwealth against a certified claim for a bonus, and shall not alter the facts as between the Commonwealth and any taxpayer.

If no advice of tax delinquency is received within such allowed time, the secretary of finance and administration may approve payment in accordance with the certificate of the administrator, and may immediately draw a warrant on the State Treasury for a check in payment, except that no warrant shall be drawn by the secretary until sufficient funds have become available to pay the bonus authorized by KRS

40.410

to

40.560

.

Upon receipt of such warrant the State Treasurer shall issue a check in accordance therewith payable from funds made available for payment of the bonus authorized by KRS 40.410 to 40.560, and the same shall promptly be mailed to the payee thereof at the address shown in the certificate.

If the secretary of finance and administration shall, within the allowed time, receive advice from the commissioner of revenue of the existence of a delinquency on the part of any person having an approved claim for a bonus, as to any tax liability to the Commonwealth, the secretary of finance and administration shall note the same on the certificate of the administrator, withhold payment, and forthwith send to the claimant by registered mail a notice of the asserted delinquency, and the amount thereof, and that it is proposed that the same be set off against the bonus payment.

If the secretary of finance and administration receives no protest in his office within ten (10) working days after recording such notice, he shall conclusively presume that the proposed set-off is just, shall apply the amount thereof in reduction or extinguishment of the payment certified by the administrator, and shall advise the commissioner of revenue of the amount set off against the bonus, which advice shall be noted by the commissioner of revenue on the records of his office as a credit upon the delinquent tax liability.

If the tax set-off does not consume the entire amount of the bonus as certified by the administrator, the secretary shall draw a warrant upon the State Treasury for a check in the amount of the remainder, and upon receiving such check from the State Treasurer, shall send the same, together with advice of the set-off, by mail, to the payee at the address shown in the certificate of the director.

If the secretary of finance and administration receives from the claimant a protest of the asserted tax delinquency, within the allowed time, the secretary shall withhold approval for payment, and shall refer the protest to the commissioner of revenue for disposition.

If a tax set-off is made, and the claimant shall assert error with regard thereto, the exclusive remedy shall be by seeking refund from the commissioner of revenue.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 14; 2005, ch. 85, § 45, effective June 20, 2005.

40.550.
Claims and payments nonassignable — Exemptions applicable to payments.

Claims for payment of a bonus shall not be assignable before or after approval thereof, and any attempted or purported assignment received by or tendered to any officer of the Commonwealth shall be void, need not be acknowledged or returned, and may be disregarded.

Payments of the bonus shall be exempt from all taxation by the Commonwealth, its political subdivisions and taxing districts.

No claim for payment of a bonus and no payment made by the Commonwealth under KRS

40.410

to

40.560

shall give rise to a cause of action against the Commonwealth or any of its officers, agents, or employees, and no claim for payment shall be subject to attachment, levy, garnishment or seizure by or under any legal or equitable process whatever; but this provision shall not extend exemption from legal process to the proceeds of any bonus payment after the same has been received from the Commonwealth.

The Commonwealth does not consent to be sued in any court with regard to any matter connected with or arising out of claims for payment of the bonus herein authorized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 15.

40.560.
Board of review — Appointment — Manner of deciding each claim — Compensation — Dissolution.

There shall be a board of review consisting of nine (9) persons who are residents and qualified voters of the Commonwealth, appointed by the Governor without limitation as to political affiliation, religion, race, sex, or past or present service in the Armed Forces, except that six (6) members of this board shall be veterans. The name of said board shall be “The Vietnam Veterans’ Bonus Board of Review.” The Governor shall designate a chairman and a secretary from among the membership.

Three (3) members and no more shall constitute a board of review, and shall by concurrence of two (2) members decide any claim which comes before the board in the manner provided in KRS

40.520

. The chairman of the board shall designate three (3) members to consider and decide each claim, having due regard for availability for service so that delay may be avoided.

The chairman and secretary shall devote their full time to the affairs of the board and shall receive compensation at the rate to be fixed in accordance with personnel standards fixed by the commissioner of personnel until the functions of the board are performed and the board is dissolved as hereinafter provided. Other members of the board shall be compensated fifty dollars ($50) per diem, but only for actual time served in considering and deciding claims for veterans’ bonuses pursuant to designation by the chairman. All members of the board shall be reimbursed for necessary travel to and from their places of residence, and in performance of duties pursuant to assignment, at the rate of eighteen cents ($0.18) per mile.

Each claim coming before the board shall promptly be considered and decided by the three (3) members designated for that purpose. In every case, the board shall either affirm the decision of the administrator, or determine that a veterans’ bonus should be paid, and to what persons and in what amounts. No written opinions or recitations of reasons for any decision need be made. A statement of the decision made shall be signed by at least two (2) of the three (3) members designated to decide the claim, and upon concurrence of two (2) members, a decision shall be final and not subject to reconsideration.

When, after the thirty-first day of January, 1992, the board of review shall have decided all cases coming before it for decision, the chairman shall report such fact to the Governor in writing. The Governor shall thereupon declare that the board of review is dissolved, and shall so notify the members, and the functions and duties of the board shall be deemed to have been fully performed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 16; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 16, § 6, effective March 1, 1991.